District of Columbia statutes.
47-161

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Apr. 30, 1994, D.C. Law 10-115, § 101, 41 DCR 1216
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(a), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-161.

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 111 of D.C. Law 10-115 provided that, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”